Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1545
Election results or returns; prohibited acts; penalty.

(1) Any person disclosing any election results or election returns before the closing of the polls without the express authorization of the election commissioner or county clerk shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

(2) Any person other than the election commissioner or county clerk who receives partial returns or election results and releases such partial returns or results without the express authorization of the election commissioner or county clerk shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

(3) Any person who attempts to disseminate any election results or election returns before the closing of the polls shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

(4) Any person who in any way causes the release of any election results or election returns without the express authorization of the election commissioner or county clerk shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 444.